Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.215.040

Establishment and maintenance discretionary.

Every board of directors shall have power to establish, equip and maintain preschools and/or provide before-and-after school care for children of working parents, in cooperation with the federal government or any of its agencies, when in their judgment the best interests of their district will be subserved thereby.

[ 1995 c 335 s 105; 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 45; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.34.050. Prior: 1943 c 220 s 5; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 5109-5. Formerly RCW 28A.34.050, 28.34.050.]

NOTES:

Part headings, table of contents not law—1995 c 335: See note following RCW 28A.150.360.

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 154: See note following RCW 2.12.030.